District of Columbia statutes.
29-705.04

Interim distributions.

A partner shall not have a right to any distribution before the dissolution and winding up of the limited partnership unless the limited partnership decides to make an interim distribution.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 504 of the Uniform Limited Partnership Act (2001 Act).